Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-4701
City of metropolitan class or primary class; powers.

A city of the metropolitan class or primary class may acquire, purchase, and operate a professional baseball organization.

Laws 1991, LB 795, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 238.